North Carolina, session 2025, HB879.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 42-42 reads as rewritten:
"§ 42-42. Landlord to provide fit premises.
(a) The landlord shall:
…
(4) Maintain in good and safe working order and promptly repair all electrical,
plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and other facilities
and appliances supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord provided
that notification of needed repairs is made to the landlord in writing by the
tenant, except in emergency situations.
(4a) Provide operable air conditioning capable of cooling the air within the
premises to maintain a reasonable indoor temperature during warm weather
conditions. The landlord shall ensure that the air conditioning system is in
good working order at the beginning of each tenancy.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to residential
rental agreements and renewals entered into on or after that date.
*H879-v-1*